Hawaii, session 2025, SB96.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 291C, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§291C-    Traffic cameras.  (a) The department of law enforcement may establish and implement any traffic camera to impose monetary liability on the registered owner of a motor vehicle for failure to comply with traffic-related laws.  The department of law enforcement may provide for the: (1)  Procurement, location, and oversight of any traffic camera; and (2)  Installation, operation, maintenance, and repair of any traffic camera through a third party contractor. Where any traffic camera affects state property, the department of law enforcement shall cooperate with and assist the county as needed to install, maintain, and repair any traffic camera established pursuant to this section. (b)  If the department of law enforcement establishes any traffic camera under this section, the compensation paid by the department to a manufacturer or vendor of the equipment used shall be based upon the value of the equipment and services provided or rendered in support of any traffic camera, and shall not be based upon a portion of the fine or civil penalty imposed or the revenue generated by the equipment. (c) The department of law enforcement may issue a citation by first class mail for any violation of traffic laws that do not mandate the physical arrest of violators within ten calendar days from the time of the incident for motor vehicles disregarding traffic laws. (d)  At least sixty days prior to traffic cameras becoming operational, the department of law enforcement, in conjunction with any county that implements traffic cameras pursuant to this section, shall conduct a comprehensive informational and educational campaign to inform motorists and the general public about the traffic cameras. (e) During the first thirty days of operation of any traffic camera in a particular traffic area, a warning shall be issued for any violation of traffic laws that do not mandate the physical arrest of violators, and mailed to the registered owner of the motor vehicle at the address on record at the vehicle licensing division, in lieu of a summons or citation pursuant to subsection (c). (f) Any person who knowingly destroys or damages a traffic camera shall be guilty of a class C felony. (g) For the purposes of this section, "traffic camera" means any camera owned and operated under the authority of the department of law enforcement." SECTION 2. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________